Alaska statutes. Title 18. Health, Safety, Housing, Human Rights, and Public Defender.
Article 2. Search and Rescue.

Administrative Code. —

For search and rescue of persons, see 13 AAC 20, art. 1.

Sec. 18.60.110.
Fund for rescue and relief of lost persons. [Repealed, § 1 ch 15 SLA 1968.]

Sec. 18.60.115.
Search and rescue training.

The commissioner of public safety or the commissioner’s designee may organize and conduct a search and rescue training exercise to prepare for a response to a search and rescue activity under AS

18.60.120

. Only the commissioner or the commissioner’s designee may authorize a person to participate in a search and rescue training exercise under this section.

History.

(§ 1 ch 98 SLA 2008)

Sec. 18.60.120.
Search and rescue parties.

Upon being notified that a person is lost, injured, killed, or is in need of immediate rescue, the commissioner of public safety or a designee may appoint a competent person to organize, direct, and guide a search and rescue party for the purpose of rescuing or retrieving the person or the person’s remains. Only the commissioner, the commissioner’s designee, or the person appointed to organize, direct, and guide a search and rescue party may authorize a person to participate in the search and rescue party.

History.

(§ 40-8-3 ACLA 1949; am § 3 ch 24 SLA 1966; am § 1 ch 57 SLA 1970; am § 1 ch 109 SLA 1980; am § 2 ch 98 SLA 2008)

Sec. 18.60.125.
Civil immunity.

A person may not bring a civil action for damages against the state, a political subdivision of the state, or the officers, agents, or employees of the state or a political subdivision of the state for a death, personal injury, or property damage that results from an act or omission in performing or failing to perform activities or duties authorized under AS

18.60.115

—

18.60.175

. This section does not apply to a civil action for damages as a result of intentional misconduct within the course and scope of employment or agency and with complete disregard for the safety and property of others.

History.

(§ 2 ch 43 SLA 2003; am § 3 ch 98 SLA 2008)

Cross references. —

For applicability provision relating to this section, see § 13, ch. 43, SLA 2003, in the 2003 Temporary and Special Acts.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for ch. 43, SLA 2003 (HB 245), which added this section, see 2003 House Journal 777— 783.

Sec. 18.60.130.
Expenses of search and rescue parties.

The expense of the search and rescue party shall be paid out of the state treasury upon vouchers properly made out, signed, and sworn to by the person appointed to direct the search and rescue party. The oath to the voucher shall be taken and made before the commissioner of public safety or a designee and may be paid only after it has been approved by the commissioner of public safety or a designee.
In approving the voucher, the commissioner of public safety or a designee shall consider the necessity of the search and rescue party, the reasonableness of the expenses, and the proper audit of the voucher.

History.

(§ 40-8-3 ACLA 1949; am § 3 ch 24 SLA 1966; am § 1 ch 80 SLA 1969; am § 2 ch 57 SLA 1970; am § 2 ch 109 SLA 1980)

Secs. 18.60.140,
18.60.145.
Limitation of amount of expenditure for search and rescue; search and rescue fund. [Repealed, § 12 ch 42 SLA 1997.]

Sec. 18.60.146.
Civil air patrol.

The Department of Public Safety shall make the necessary administrative arrangements for maintaining liaison between the state and the Civil Air Patrol and the expenditure of money appropriated to the department for the state contribution toward the support of the authorized activities of the Alaska Wing, Civil Air Patrol, under its charter.

History.

(E.O. No. 59, § 2 (1985))

Sec. 18.60.148.
Transfer of forfeited aircraft to civil air patrol.

A transfer to the Alaska Wing, Civil Air Patrol, of a forfeited aircraft under AS

16.05.195(f)

, AS

17.30.122

, or another state law or regulation is subject to the following conditions:

the transfer shall be made without cost to the Civil Air Patrol;

the aircraft becomes a corporate Civil Air Patrol aircraft;

the aircraft may only be used for Civil Air Patrol search and rescue, civil defense, and training purposes;

the aircraft may not be transferred to another wing of the Civil Air Patrol unless

the aircraft has been corporate aircraft of the Alaska Wing, Civil Air Patrol for at least 36 months after the date of transfer to the Alaska Wing; or

the aircraft is being exchanged for another Civil Air Patrol corporate aircraft of equivalent or greater value;

if the Civil Air Patrol determines that the aircraft should be disposed of as surplus property, the disposition shall first be approved by the Department of Administration.

A transfer of a forfeited aircraft under this section shall be consummated by a contract between the State of Alaska and the Alaska Wing, Civil Air Patrol that includes the conditions set out in (a) of this section. The contract must also provide that the Civil Air Patrol indemnify the state for any amount for which the state may be liable for an act or omission relating to the aircraft.

History.

(E.O. No. 59, § 2 (1985))

Sec. 18.60.150.
Report of mysterious disappearance or separation from companions.

If a person (1) mysteriously disappears in the state, or (2) leaves one locality to go to another in the state and fails within a reasonable time to reach the person’s destination, or (3) traveling in company with another is separated from the other, or (4) traveling alone mysteriously disappears, a traveling companion or any other person having knowledge of the mysterious disappearance or separation shall notify the commissioner of public safety or a designee in the district in which the disappearance or separation took place of the fact, in writing, stating all the circumstances.

History.

(§ 40-8-7 ACLA 1949; am § 3 ch 24 SLA 1966; am § 4 ch 57 SLA 1970)

Sec. 18.60.160.
Violation a misdemeanor.

A person who fails to report a disappearance under AS

18.60.150

, or who violates a regulation adopted under AS

18.60.175

, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

(§ 40-8-7 ACLA 1949; am § 5 ch 57 SLA 1970)

Cross references. —

For classification of misdemeanors, see AS

11.81.250(c)

; for fines and sentences for misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.035

and

12.55.135

.

Sec. 18.60.170.
Report and investigation of disappearance.

The commissioner of public safety or a designee shall file each notification of disappearance with the missing persons information clearinghouse under AS

18.65.620

, and shall notify the peace officer in the district where the disappearance occurred or in the nearest districts where there is a peace officer to make an investigation regarding the disappearance. If the circumstances give reasonable grounds for suspicion that a murder has been committed or that a person has met with foul play, the peace officer shall report all the facts to the district attorney in the peace officer’s district or the assistant district attorney living nearest the place where the peace officer resides. The district attorney or the assistant district attorney shall assist and advise the peace officer in the investigation.

History.

(§ 40-8-7 ACLA 1949; am § 3 ch 24 SLA 1966; am § 6 ch 57 SLA 1970; am § 2 ch 72 SLA 1988)

Sec. 18.60.175.
Regulations.

The Department of Public Safety shall adopt regulations necessary to carry out the duties assigned by AS

18.60.115

—

18.60.170

, including regulations dealing with the handling of nonexpendable property purchased during a search or rescue mission and expenditures of money for search and rescue. The regulations shall be adopted in accordance with AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act).

History.

(§ 7 ch 57 SLA 1970; am § 5 ch 109 SLA 1980; am § 4 ch 98 SLA 2008)

Administrative Code. —

For search and rescue of persons, see 13 AAC 20, art. 1.